District of Columbia statutes.
31-5728

Repealed

Separation of fraternal and insurance activities — Applicability of state and District laws.

Repealed.

Apr. 12, 1930, 46 Stat. 160, ch. 135, § 7
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(c), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1228.
1973 Ed., § 35-928.